Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-1402
Municipality, defined.

For the purposes of sections 72-1401 to 72-1408 municipality shall mean any city, village, or county of this state.

Laws 1967, c. 464, § 2, p. 1435;

Laws 1974, LB 914, § 6.